Utah statutes.
16-10a-728.   Voting for directors -- Cumulative voting.

(1)  At each election of directors, unless otherwise provided in the articles of incorporation or this chapter, every shareholder entitled to vote at the election has the right to cast, in person or by proxy, all of the votes to which the shareholder's shares are entitled for as many persons as there are directors to be elected and for whose election the shareholder has the right to vote.

(2)  Unless otherwise provided in the articles of incorporation or this chapter, directors are elected by a plurality of the votes cast by the shares entitled to vote in the election, at a meeting of shareholders at which a quorum is present.

(3)  Shareholders do not have a right to cumulate their votes for the election of directors unless the articles of incorporation so provide.

(4)  A statement included in the articles of incorporation to the effect that all or a designated voting group of shareholders are entitled to cumulate their votes for directors, means that the shareholders designated are entitled to multiply the number of votes they are entitled to cast by the number of directors for whom they are entitled to vote and cast the product for a single candidate or distribute the product among two or more candidates.

(5)  Shares entitled to vote cumulatively may be voted cumulatively at each election of directors unless the articles of incorporation provide alternative procedures for the exercise of the cumulative voting rights.



Enacted by Chapter 277, 1992 General Session

